Missouri, session 2026, HB1663.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 163.048, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 163.048, to read as follows:
163.048. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Athletics", any interscholastic athletic games, contests, programs, activities,
exhibitions, or other similar competitions organized and provided for students;
(2) "Sex", the two main categories of male and female into which individuals are
divided based on an individual's reproductive biology at birth and the individual's genome.
2. (1) The general assembly hereby finds the following:
(a) A noticeable disparity continues between the athletics participation rates of
students who are male and students who are female; and
(b) Courts have recognized that classification by sex is the only feasible classification
to promote the governmental interest of providing opportunities for athletics for females.
(2) The general assembly hereby declares that it is the public policy of this state to
further the governmental interest of ensuring that sufficient opportunities for athletics remain
available for females to remedy past discrimination on the basis of sex.
3. (1) Except as provided under subdivision (2) of this subsection, no private school,
public school district, public charter school, or public or private institution of postsecondary
education shall allow any student to compete in an athletics competition that is designated for
the biological sex opposite to the student's biological sex as correctly stated on the student's
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1663, 1607 & 1973 2
official birth certificate as described in subsection 4 of this section or, if the student's official
birth certificate is unobtainable, another government record.
(2) A private school, public school, public charter school, or public or private
institution of postsecondary education may allow a female student to compete in an athletics
competition that is designated for male students if no corresponding athletics competition
designated for female students is offered or available.
4. For purposes of this section, a statement of a student's biological sex on the
student's official birth certificate or another government record shall be deemed to have
correctly stated the student's biological sex only if the statement was:
(1) Entered at or near the time of the student's birth; or
(2) Modified to correct any scrivener's error in the student's biological sex.
5. A private school, public school district, public charter school, or public or private
institution of postsecondary education that violates subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this
section shall not receive any state aid under this chapter or chapter 173 or any other revenues
from the state.
6. The parent or guardian of any student, or any student who is over eighteen years of
age, who is deprived of an athletic opportunity as a result of a violation of this section shall
have a cause of action for injunctive or other equitable relief, as well as payment of
reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expenses of the parent, guardian, or student. The relief
and remedies set forth shall not be deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other
relief or remedies permitted by law.
7. The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of
higher education and workforce development shall each promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the implementation and administration of this section. Such rules and
regulations shall ensure compliance with state and federal law regarding the confidentiality of
student medical information. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2023, shall be
invalid and void.
8. [The provisions of this section shall expire on August 28, 2027.

HCS HBs 1663, 1607 & 1973 3
9.] If any provision of this section or the application thereof to anyone or to any
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this section and the application of such
provisions to others or other circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
✔